District of Columbia statutes.
8-671.13

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act [this chapter], consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-95, § 113, 53 DCR 1652

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act.